Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 2 Administration of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, Addictive Diseases, and Other Disability Services

Cross references.

State health planning and development generally, T. 31, C. 6.

Regulation and construction of hospitals and other health care facilities, T. 31, C. 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1357, § 1 designated Code Sections 37-2-1 through 37-2-12 as Article 1 of this chapter and enacted Code Sections 37-2-30 [repealed] through 37-2-34, designated as Article 2.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency receiving, evaluating and treatment facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-1.

Pretrial examination and for commitment because of incompetency to stand trial, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-3.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014).

For note on 1991 amendments to this chapter, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 121 (1992).